Washington statutes.
RCW 18.380.020

Licensure or certification required—Unauthorized practices.

(1)(a) Except as provided in RCW 18.380.030, no person may engage in the practice of applied behavior analysis unless he or she holds a license or a temporary license under this chapter. The use of behavioral techniques described in RCW 18.380.010(6)(a)(iii) alone does not constitute the practice of applied behavior analysis.

(b) A person not licensed under this chapter may not represent himself or herself as a "licensed behavior analyst" or a "licensed assistant behavior analyst."

(2) Except as provided in RCW 18.380.030, no person may practice as a certified behavior technician in this state without having a certification issued by the secretary. A person not certified under this chapter may not represent himself or herself as a "certified behavior technician."

[ 2015 c 118 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 c 118: See note following RCW 18.380.010.